Arkansas, session 2025, HB1348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-4-608(d)(2), regarding benefits for a
deceased member’s surviving child in the Arkansas Public Employees’
Retirement System, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) A child is considered a dependent child as used in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section and for purposes of receiving a child
survivor's annuity until the child's death, marriage, or attainment of
eighteen (18) twenty-three (23) years of age, whichever occurs first.
(B)(i) However, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended
as long as the child continues uninterruptedly being a full-time student at
an accredited secondary school, college, or university, but in no event
beyond his or her attainment of twenty-three (23) years of age.
*LJH118*
03-12-2025 14:04:29 LJH118

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 HB1348
(ii) In addition, the age-eighteen The twenty-three maximum age
shall be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or mentally
incompetent by an Arkansas court of competent jurisdiction or by the Board of
Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, for as long as
the incompetency exists.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-6-216(d), regarding benefits for a
deceased retiree’s surviving child in the State Police Retirement System Tier
One benefit plan, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1)(A) A child shall be a dependent child until his or her death,
his or her marriage, or his or her attainment of eighteen (18) twenty-three
(23) years of age, whichever occurs first.
(B)(i) However, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended
as long as the child is continuously enrolled as a full-time student at an
accredited secondary school or accredited postsecondary institution of higher
education, but in no event beyond his or her attainment of twenty-three (23)
years of age.
(ii) The eighteen-year twenty-three-year maximum age
shall also be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or
mentally incompetent by a court with jurisdiction over the individual or by
the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, for as long as
the incompetency exists.
(2) Once a child ceases to be dependent, his or her annuity
shall terminate and there shall be a redetermination of the amount payable to
any remaining dependent children.
(3) The board is authorized to establish through rules a means
of verification of enrollment in a secondary school or postsecondary
institution of higher education by a surviving dependent child under this
section for purposes of pension benefits.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 24-6-217(e)(1)(A) and (B), regarding
benefits for a deceased member’s surviving child before retirement in the
State Police Retirement System, are amended to read as follows:
(e)(1)(A) A child is a dependent child for purposes of receiving a
survivor's annuity until the child's death, marriage, or attainment of
eighteen (18) twenty-three (23) years of age, whichever occurs first.
03-12-2025 14:04:29 LJH118

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 HB1348
(B)(i) However, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended
as long as the child is continuously enrolled as a full-time student at an
accredited secondary school or accredited postsecondary institution of higher
education, but in no event beyond his or her attainment of twenty-three (23)
years of age.
(ii) The age-eighteen The twenty-three maximum age
shall also be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or
mentally incompetent by a court with jurisdiction over the individual or by
the Board of Trustees of the State Police Retirement System, for as long as
the incompetency exists.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 24-6-411(d)(3), regarding benefits for a
deceased member’s surviving child in the State Police Retirement System Tier
Two Benefit Plan, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(3)(A) A child is considered a dependent child as used in
subdivision (d)(1) of this section and for purposes of receiving a survivor's
annuity until the child's death, marriage, or attainment of eighteen (18)
twenty-three (23) years of age, whichever occurs first.
(B)(i) However, the age-eighteen maximum shall be extended
as long as the child continues uninterruptedly being a full-time student at
an accredited secondary school, college, or university but in no event beyond
his or her attainment of twenty-three (23) years of age.
(ii) The age-eighteen twenty-three maximum age shall
be extended for any child who has been deemed physically or mentally
incompetent by an Arkansas court of competent jurisdiction or by the Board of
Trustees of the State Police Retirement System for as long as the
incompetency exists.

SECTION 5. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the law
related to the extension of benefits to surviving children of members of the
Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the State Police Retirement
System are in need of revision and updating to streamline the provision of
support for beneficiaries; that the respective retirement systems operate on
a fiscal calendar year of July 1 to June 30; that having a July 1, 2025,
effective date is necessary to allow the provisions within this act to begin
03-12-2025 14:04:29 LJH118

As Engrossed: S3/12/25 HB1348
on the first day of the fiscal year to provide proper administration of the
procedures herein; that such revisions and updating are of great importance
for actuarial purposes and to protect the benefits to members of the Arkansas
Public Employees’ Retirement System and the State Police Retirement System;
and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly
system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Public Employees’
Retirement System and the State Police Retirement System. Therefore, an
emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on July 1, 2025.

/s/Warren
























03-12-2025 14:04:29 LJH118